apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="/hunn__vbhaver">
  <e>       <p><l>hu</l>        <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gehat</l>     <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>hu</l>        <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hues</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>huet</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hu</l>        <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hutt</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hu</l>        <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>hätt</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>häss</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hätt</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hätte</l>     <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hätt</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hätte</l>     <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>hat</l>       <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>has</l>       <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hat</l>       <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hate</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hat</l>       <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hate</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>hief</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>hieft</l>     <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>hutt</l>      <r>hunn<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="k/ënnen__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>ënne</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onnt</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anns</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënne</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënnt</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënne</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éint</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éints</l>     <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éint</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinte</l>     <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éint</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinte</l>     <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>onnt</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onnts</l>     <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onnt</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onnte</l>     <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onnt</l>      <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onnte</l>     <r>ënnen<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="soll/en__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>en<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="a/n__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="pr"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aus__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="an__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="datt__cnjsub">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

<pardef n="e/en__num">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ng</l>        <r>en<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="zw/ee__num">
  <e>       <p><l>éi</l>        <r>ee<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ou</l>        <r>ee<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ee</l>        <r>ee<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dräi__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="hunn">            <i></i><par n="/hunn__vbhaver"/></e>
<e lm="kënnen">          <i>k</i><par n="k/ënnen__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="sollen">          <i>soll</i><par n="soll/en__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="mussen">          <i>muss</i><par n="soll/en__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="amplaz">          <i>amplaz</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="an">              <i>a</i><par n="a/n__pr"/></e>
<e lm="aus">             <i>aus</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="baussen">         <i>baussen</i><par n="a/n__pr"/></e>
<e lm="bei">             <i>bei</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="bis">             <i>bis</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="duerch">          <i>duerch</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ëm">              <i>ëm</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ënner">           <i>ënner</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="fir">             <i>fir</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="géint">           <i>géint</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="géintiwwer">      <i>géintiwwer</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="hanner">          <i>hanner</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="iwwer">           <i>iwwer</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="mat">             <i>mat</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="nieft">           <i>nieft</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="niewen">          <i>niewe</i><par n="a/n__pr"/></e>
<e lm="no">              <i>no</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="op">              <i>op</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ouni">            <i>ouni</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="pro">             <i>pro</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tëschen">         <i>tësche</i><par n="a/n__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tëschent">        <i>tëschent</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tëscht">          <i>tëscht</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="un">              <i>u</i><par n="a/n__pr"/></e>
<e lm="virun">           <i>viru</i><par n="a/n__pr"/></e>
<e lm="vun">             <i>vu</i><par n="a/n__pr"/></e>
<e lm="wéinst">          <i>wéinst</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="widder">          <i>widder</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="zanter">          <i>zanter</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="zu">              <i>zu</i><par n="aus__pr"/></e>
<e lm="an">              <i>an</i><par n="an__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="mä">              <i>mä</i><par n="an__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="oder">            <i>oder</i><par n="an__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="datt">            <i>datt</i><par n="datt__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="nodeem">          <i>nodeem</i><par n="datt__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="wann">            <i>wann</i><par n="datt__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="well">            <i>well</i><par n="datt__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="wou">             <i>wou</i><par n="datt__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="een">             <i>e</i><par n="e/en__num"/></e>
<e lm="zwee">            <i>zw</i><par n="zw/ee__num"/></e>
<e lm="véier">           <i>véier</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="sechs">           <i>sechs</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="aacht">           <i>aacht</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="zéng">            <i>zéng</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="zwielef">         <i>zwielef</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="véierzéng">       <i>véierzéng</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="siechzéng">       <i>siechzéng</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="uechtzéng">       <i>uechtzéng</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="zwanzeg">         <i>zwanzeg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="zweeanzwanzeg">   <i>zweeanzwanzeg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="véieranzwanzeg">  <i>véieranzwanzeg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="sechsanzwanzeg">  <i>sechsanzwanzeg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="drësseg">         <i>drësseg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="véierandrësseg">  <i>véierandrësseg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="aachtandrësseg">  <i>aachtandrësseg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="zweeavéierzeg">   <i>zweeavéierzeg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="sechsavéierzeg">  <i>sechsavéierzeg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="fofzeg">          <i>fofzeg</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="III">             <i>III</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="VI">              <i>VI</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="XI">              <i>XI</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIX">             <i>XIX</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVIII">           <i>XVIII</i><par n="dräi__num"/></e>
